src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_A_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲íiyä - ENGLISH : # CLASS_A_STEM_2

     k̲íiya+V+Dir+Past: k̲íiyägan
     k̲íiya+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägang
     k̲íiya+V+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyäganggang
     k̲íiya+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲íiyägangang
     k̲íiya+V+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+Pl+Impv: k̲íiyäʼuu
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲íiyäʼwägan
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼaawaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲íiyäʼaawaan
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Rel: k̲íiyäʼwaas
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲íiyäʼaawaas
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼaawaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägangʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägangʼwaang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲íiyägangʼwaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼwägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼwägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼwägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲íiyäʼwaaäs
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsga
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Res: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼus
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲íiyäʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Cont: k̲íiyäʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲íiyäʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Rflx: k̲íiyäʼwaaʼahl
     k̲íiya+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲íiyäʼwaaäseehl
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: k̲íiyäʼang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangga
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Dir+Past: k̲íiyäʼanggan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Indir+Past: k̲íiyäʼaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Rel: k̲íiyäʼans
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: k̲íiyäʼaangaas
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼangang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼaangaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyäʼanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägangʼanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲íiyägangʼangang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼanggaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼanggaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲íiyäʼangäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲íiyäʼangäs
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangäsga
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼangäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼuuj
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Res: k̲íiyäʼangäsaaʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼus
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼujaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼuujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangäsaaʼus
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: k̲íiyäʼaangʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cert+Past: k̲íiyäʼaangʼahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangäsaaʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: k̲íiyäʼaangʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Ints+Past: k̲íiyäʼaangaaʼahlang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Cont: k̲íiyäʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: k̲íiyäʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Rflx: k̲íiyäʼaangʼahl
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲íiyäʼangäseehl
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: k̲íiyäʼangʼuu
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼwägan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaas
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaas
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägangʼangʼwaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: k̲íiyägangʼangʼwaang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: k̲íiyägangʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼwägiinii
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼwägaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼwägaangaan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäs
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsga
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaas
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲íiyäʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Res: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼus
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲íiyäʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaʼahl
     k̲íiya+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲íiyäʼangʼwaaäseehl
